South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-47-37(A)(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) be licensed to practice medicine in this State; provided, however, notwithstanding the requirements of Section 40-47-195(D)(a)(ii), a licensee need not reside or maintain a physical office in this State to be considered actively practicing medicine within the geographical boundaries of this State if he has a valid, current South Carolina medical license; further, provided, that a licensee who resides in this State and intends to practice medicine via telemedicine to treat or diagnose patients outside of this State shall comply with other applicable state licensing boards; and (a) this requirement is not applicable to an informal consultation or second opinion, at the request of a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State, provided that the physician requesting the opinion retains the authority and responsibility for the patient's care; and (b) where an in-person physician-patient relationship is established in another state for specialty care and treatment is ongoing by that out-of-state provider, care provided pursuant to an existing treatment plan via telehealth in this State by the out-of-state provider between in-person visits is considered acts incidental to the care of the patient in another state and the out-of-state provider is not required to be licensed in this State. This exception may not be construed to apply to: (i) episodic care that is provided by an out-of-state provider; (ii) new health conditions that arise and are not connected to the condition being treated by the out-of-state provider; or (iii) care provided by an out-of-state provider for extended periods of time without intervening in-person visits; and (c) for purposes of subitems (a) and (b), the care provided to the patient by the out-of-state provider is deemed to have occurred where the patient was located at the time health care services were provided to him by means of telehealth; and (d) shall maintain a controlled substances registration with South Carolina's Bureau of Drug Control if prescribing controlled substances. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----